Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5432.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 27-38.2-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-38.2 entitled "Insurance
Coverage for Mental Illness and Substance Use Disorders" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-38.2-1. Coverage for treatment of mental health and substance use disorders.
(a) A group health plan and an individual or group health insurance plan shall provide
coverage for the treatment of mental health and substance use disorders under the same terms and
conditions as that coverage is provided for other illnesses and diseases.
(b) Coverage for the treatment of mental health and substance use disorders shall not
impose any annual or lifetime dollar limitation.
(c) Financial requirements and quantitative treatment limitations on coverage for the
treatment of mental health and substance use disorders shall be no more restrictive than the
predominant financial requirements applied to substantially all coverage for medical conditions in
each treatment classification.
(d) Coverage shall not impose non-quantitative treatment limitations for the treatment of
mental health and substance use disorders unless the processes, strategies, evidentiary standards,
or other factors used in applying the non-quantitative treatment limitation, as written and in
operation, are comparable to, and are applied no more stringently than, the processes, strategies,
evidentiary standards, or other factors used in applying the limitation with respect to
medical/surgical benefits in the classification.

(e) The following classifications shall be used to apply the coverage requirements of this
chapter: (1) Inpatient, in-network; (2) Inpatient, out-of-network; (3) Outpatient, in-network; (4)
Outpatient, out-of-network; (5) Emergency care; and (6) Prescription drugs.
(f) Medication-assisted treatment or medication-assisted maintenance services of substance
use disorders, opioid overdoses, and chronic addiction, including methadone, buprenorphine,
naltrexone, or other clinically appropriate medications, is included within the appropriate
classification based on the site of the service.
(g) Payors shall rely upon the criteria of the American Society of Addiction Medicine when
developing coverage for levels of care for substance use disorder treatment.
(h) Patients with substance use disorders shall have access to evidence-based, non-opioid
treatment for pain, therefore coverage shall apply to medically necessary chiropractic care and
osteopathic manipulative treatment performed by an individual licensed under § 5-37-2.
(i) Parity of cost-sharing requirements. Regardless of the professional license of the
provider of care, if that care is consistent with the provider’s scope of practice and the health plan’s
credentialing and contracting provisions, cost sharing for behavioral health counseling visits and
medication maintenance visits shall be consistent with the cost sharing applied to primary care
office visits.
(j) No health insurers shall require prior authorization, for in-network inpatient and in-
network outpatient mental health or substance use disorder services. The office of the health
insurance commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations and conduct oversight and
enforcement actions necessary to implement this subsection, including the imposition of fines for
violations.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC000796/SUB A
========
LC000796/SUB A - Page 2 of 3